Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 2 Minimum Funding Standards

47-20-10.
Minimum annual employer contribution.

In order to assure the actuarial soundness of each retirement system, the minimum annual employer contribution for each retirement system, unless excepted by Code Section 47-20-13, shall be the sum of the amounts determined under paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection minus the amount determined under paragraph (4) of this subsection; provided, however, that under no circumstances shall the minimum annual employer contribution be less than zero or result in a contribution credit for a subsequent year, as follows:

The normal cost of the retirement system for the year; plus

The amounts necessary to amortize:

The unfunded actuarial accrued liability over a period of 40 years in the case of a retirement system in existence on January 1, 1983, based on the first actuarial valuation of the retirement system which is made on or after January 1, 1984; or

The unfunded actuarial accrued liability over a period of 30 years in the case of a retirement system which is created or established after January 1, 1983, based on the first actuarial valuation of the retirement system; plus

The increase, if any, in unfunded actuarial accrued liability over a period of 20 years for any such increase which occurs after January 1, 1984, during any year as a result of changes made in the provisions of the retirement system affecting active employees; plus

The increase, if any, in unfunded actuarial accrued liability over a period of 15 years for any such increase which occurs from experience under the actuarial assumptions applicable to the retirement system; plus

The increase, if any, in unfunded actuarial accrued liability over a period of 30 years for any such increase resulting from changes in actuarial assumptions applicable to the retirement system; plus

If not otherwise included in the calculations under paragraph (1) or (2) or paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection:

The amount necessary to amortize over a period of ten years in equal annual installments the increase, if any, in unfunded actuarial accrued liability resulting from benefit increases granted during the year to beneficiaries under the retirement system; or

The amount necessary to pay the amount of increase in benefits granted during the year to beneficiaries under the retirement system on a current disbursement or pay-as-you-go basis; minus

The amount:

Necessary to amortize the decrease, if any, in unfunded actuarial accrued liability over a period of 20 years for any such decrease which occurs after January 1, 1984, during any year as a result of changes made in the provisions of the retirement system; plus

Necessary to amortize the decrease in unfunded actuarial accrued liability, if any, over a period of 15 years for any such decrease which occurs from experience under the actuarial assumptions applicable to the retirement system; plus

Necessary to amortize the decrease in unfunded actuarial accrued liability, if any, over a period of 30 years for any such decrease resulting from changes in the actuarial assumptions applicable to the retirement system; plus

In excess of the minimum annual employer contribution required by this Code section which accumulates after January 1, 1984; plus

Employee contributions for the year.

In the case of a retirement system which uses a formula related to the compensation of the members of the retirement system as a basis for the calculation of benefits under the retirement system, the amortization amounts required by subsection (a) of this Code section, except for the amount determined under paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section, may be determined as a level percentage of future compensation. If such level percentage amortization is used, the actuarial assumption for future annual payroll growth shall not exceed the actuarial assumed valuation interest rate of the retirement system less 2 1/2 percent. The minimum standards provided by subsection (a) of this Code section are deemed to have been met if such level percentage amortization is used and the employer contribution is equal to or greater than the annual required contribution as is determined in accordance with the provisions of Governmental Accounting Standards Board Statements No. 25 and No. 27 as in effect on June 15, 2013.

In the case of a retirement system which does not use a formula related to the compensation of the members of such retirement system as a basis for the calculation of benefits under such retirement system, the minimum funding standards provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be deemed to have been met if the employer contribution is equal to or greater than the annual contribution as determined in accordance with the provisions of Governmental Accounting Standards Board Statements No. 25 and No. 27 as in effect on June 15, 2013.

The minimum funding standards provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be deemed to have been met if as of the latest actuarial valuation a retirement system has a negative unfunded actuarial accrued liability and the employer contribution is equal to or greater than the annual required contribution as determined in accordance with the provisions of Governmental Accounting Standards Board Statements No. 25 and No. 27 as in effect on June 15, 2013; provided, however, that in no case shall the negative unfunded actuarial accrued liability be amortized over a period of less than ten years. If a retirement system has such a negative unfunded actuarial accrued liability, the amounts necessary to amortize under paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section established prior to the current actuarial valuation date will be considered to be fully amortized under the minimum funding standards provided by subsection (a) of this Code section.

In any actuarial valuation subsequent to the valuation in which a retirement system is found to have complied with the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection, if the retirement system still has a negative unfunded actuarial accrued liability, the only amortization required under such minimum funding standards will be an amortization of the negative unfunded actuarial accrued liability over a period of not less than ten years of the actuarial accrued liability. For any such subsequent actuarial valuations, whenever the retirement system again has an unfunded actuarial accrued liability, the minimum standards provided by subsection (a) of this Code section shall apply with new amounts necessary to amortize the newly created unfunded actuarial accrued liability.

In determining the minimum annual employer contribution under subsection (a) of this Code section:

All benefits which it is reasonable to anticipate will be paid from the retirement system because of the current active members and payments to beneficiaries shall be taken into account; and

All costs, liabilities, and other factors under the retirement system shall be determined by an actuary on the basis of an actuarial cost method and actuarial assumptions which, in the aggregate, are reasonable, considering the experience of the retirement system and reasonable expectations, and which, in combination, offer the actuary’s best estimate of anticipated experience under the retirement system.

Upon completion of the first actuarial investigation of a retirement system after January 1, 1984, and for each subsequent actuarial investigation, the minimum annual employer contribution required by this Code section shall be increased by an amount equivalent to the interest earned on such minimum annual employer contribution, based on the actuarial assumed valuation interest rate applicable to the retirement system, from the date of such actuarial investigation until the date the minimum annual employer contribution is made to the retirement system. This subsection shall not apply to a retirement system to which annual employer contributions are being made in excess of the minimum annual employer contribution required by this Code section.

In no event will employee contributions of active members of a retirement system be used to pay benefits to beneficiaries under the retirement system.

The minimum funding requirements of this Code section shall not apply to prefunding, in whole or in part, of anticipated future costs of providing other post-employment benefits as defined by Governmental Accounting Standards Board Statements Number 43 and Number 45 for retired employees of a political subdivision including those presently retired and those anticipated to retire in the future, as provided in Code Section 47-20-10.1. Such prefunding may be maintained as part of the same investment pool as the fund receiving employer and employee contributions to pay the cost of providing retirement benefits under any retirement system maintained by the political subdivision for its employees so long as such funds are separately accounted for and separate records are maintained with respect to each fund. Funds maintained by a political subdivision for the purpose of prefunding other post-employment benefits for retired employees may be invested and reinvested in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 47-1-12, or Article 7 of Chapter 20 of this title, as applicable, and, for the purposes of that Code section or article and the home rule provisions of the laws and the Constitution of the State of Georgia only, such funds shall be treated in the same manner as retirement funds.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1368, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 209, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 685, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1208, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 21, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 27/HB 460; Ga. L. 2007, p. 68, § 1/SB 156; Ga. L. 2014, p. 198, § 2/HB 761.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added “as in effect on June 15, 2013” at the end of subsections (b) and (c); and inserted “as in effect on June 15, 2013” in the middle of the first sentence of paragraph (d)(1).

47-20-10.1.
Other post-employment benefits.

Political subdivisions are authorized to establish plans to provide for payment of other post-employment benefits, as defined by Governmental Accounting Standards Board Statements Number 43 and Number 45 for their eligible present and future retirees and other related expenses as described herein. Such benefits may be prefunded by irrevocable trusts or other authorized funding mechanisms subject to the financial reporting, disclosure, and actuarial requirements of Governmental Accounting Standards Board Statements Number 43 and Number 45 or any subsequent Governmental Accounting Standards Board updates or statements that may be applicable. Except as otherwise provided under subsection (c) of this Code section, the plan and assets of any trust or fund so established may be under the governance and investment authority of a retirement system maintained by the political subdivision or other board of trustees established for such purpose; provided, however, that the assets of any other post-retirement benefit plan, trust, or fund shall be separately accounted for and separate records shall be maintained. The prefunded amounts shall be available without fiscal year limitations for other post-employment benefits, as defined by Governmental Accounting Standards Board Statements Number 43 and Number 45, and administration costs. All employer contributions, plan participant contributions, appropriations, earnings, and reserves for the payment of obligations under the plan shall be credited to such trust or fund. The amounts remaining in such trust or fund, if any, after other post-employment benefit expenses and administration costs have been paid in any year shall be retained in such trust or fund for future payments until the satisfaction of all plan liabilities under the trust or fund for other post-employment benefits. All prefunded amounts shall be used solely for the payment of plan benefits and administrative costs and for no other purpose.

Prefunded assets of whatever kind or nature of any other post-employment benefit plan or trust, and the earnings or proceeds derived from such investments or assets, are limited to paying other post-employment benefits and administrative costs and are declared to be public property and exempt from taxation by this state, or by any political subdivision of this state, and exempt from levy and sale, garnishment, attachment, or any other process whatsoever.

Employers who are eligible to participate in the Georgia Municipal Employees Benefit System created by Chapter 5 of this title may establish or participate in another post-employment benefit plan, trust, or fund under the governance and investment authority of the board of trustees of the Georgia Municipal Employees Benefit System, notwithstanding any provision of this Code section or Code Section 47-20-10 to the contrary. The assets of any such plan, trust, or fund under the governance and investment authority of the board of trustees of the Georgia Municipal Employees Benefit System may be maintained as part of the same investment pool as the system retirement fund and invested pursuant to the applicable provisions of Article 7 of Chapter 20 of Title 47, notwithstanding any provision of subsection (c) of Code Section 47-5-28 to the contrary, so long as the assets of the plan, trust, or fund and the Georgia Municipal Employees Benefit System retirement fund are separately accounted for and separate records are maintained for the plan, trust, or fund and the Georgia Municipal Employees Benefit System retirement fund.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-10.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 68, § 2/SB 156.

47-20-11.
[Reserved] Minimum funding causing financial hardship in local retirement system.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 56, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Code 1981, §

47-20-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1368, § 1.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-20-12.
[Reserved] State controlled systems; certification of conformance to standards; freezing of benefits and other provisions when not in conformance.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 57, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Code 1981, §

47-20-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1368, § 1.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-20-13.
Financially sound systems exempt from minimum funding standards.

The minimum funding standards specified by Code Section 47-20-10 shall not apply to a retirement system which holds actuarial assets in excess of 150 percent of the actuarial present value of the accumulated retirement system benefits.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1368, § 1.